Wisconsin, session 2025, SB168.
do enact as follows:SB168,11Section 1. 102.17 (9) (a) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 102.17 (9) (a) 1m. 2and amended to read:SB168,2,63102.17 (9) (a) 1m. “Fire fighter” “Firefighter” means any person employed on 4a full-time basis by the state or any political subdivision as a member or officer of a 5fire department, including the 1st class cities and state fire marshal and deputies 6or an individual who volunteers as a member or officer of such a department.SB168,27Section 2. 102.17 (9) (a) 1c. of the statutes is created to read:SB168,3,21102.17 (9) (a) 1c. “Correctional officer” has the meaning given in s. 102.475 (8) 2(a).SB168,33Section 3. 102.17 (9) (a) 1e. of the statutes is created to read:SB168,3,54102.17 (9) (a) 1e. “Emergency medical responder” has the meaning given in s. 5256.01 (4p).SB168,46Section 4. 102.17 (9) (a) 1g. of the statutes is created to read:SB168,3,87102.17 (9) (a) 1g. “Emergency medical services practitioner” has the meaning 8given in s. 256.01 (5).SB168,59Section 5. 102.17 (9) (a) 1p. of the statutes is created to read:SB168,3,1510102.17 (9) (a) 1p. “Medicolegal investigation staff member” includes a chief 11deputy coroner, a deputy coroner, a deputy medical examiner, and any individual 12who assists the office of a coroner or medical examiner with an investigation of a 13death. “Medicolegal investigation staff member” does not include an individual 14performing solely administrative functions in the office of a coroner or medical 15examiner.SB168,616Section 6. 102.17 (9) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB168,4,217102.17 (9) (b) (intro.) Subject to par. (c), in the case of a mental injury that is 18not accompanied by a physical injury and that results in a diagnosis of post-19traumatic stress disorder in a law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 23.33 (1) (ig), 20an emergency medical responder, an emergency services practitioner, a correctional 21officer, a public safety answering point dispatcher, a coroner, a medical examiner, a 22medicolegal investigation staff member, or a fire fighter firefighter, the claim for 1compensation for the mental injury, in order to be compensable under this chapter, 2is subject to all of the following:SB168,73Section 7. Nonstatutory provisions.SB168,4,84(1) Worker’s compensation insurance; rate approval; notice. The 5commissioner of insurance shall submit to the legislative reference bureau for 6publication in the Wisconsin Administrative Register a notice of the effective date of 7new rates for worker’s compensation insurance first approved by the commissioner 8after the effective date of this subsection.SB168,89Section 8. Initial applicability.SB168,4,1310(1) The treatment of s. 102.17 (9) (a) 1., 1c., 1e., 1g., and 1p. and (b) (intro.) 11first applies to injuries reported on the effective date of rate changes for worker’s 12compensation insurance approved by the commissioner of insurance under s. 626.13 13after the effective date of this subsection.SB168,4,1414